Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.10.510

State official. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

"State official" means a person who holds a state office.

[ 2024 c 164 s 251.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.